North Carolina, session 2025, SB900.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Commerce the sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used as provided in this act. Funds
appropriated in this section do not revert but remain available to the Department for the purposes
provided in this act.
SECTION 1.(b) Purpose. – The purpose of this section is to help small businesses
in North Carolina that experienced economic disruption as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic
by providing grants awarded by the Department, in consultation with the North Carolina
Department of Revenue, to offset the economic harm suffered and to promote economic
development and maintain economic stability by helping to preserve and sustain a vital element
of the State's economy.
SECTION 1.(c) Small Business Recovery Program. – There is created the
COVID-19 Small Business Recovery Program to be administered by the Department of
Commerce. The Department may provide a one-time grant to each qualifying business. For
purposes of this section, a qualifying business is an entity (i) subject to income tax under Article
4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, (ii) with annual receipts, when combined with the
annual receipts of all related persons, for the 2019 tax year of eight million dollars ($8,000,000)
or less, and (iii) a reduction of at least twenty-five percent (25%) in sales tax collections resulting
from the COVID-19 pandemic for the 2020 tax year when compared to collections for the 2019
tax year.
SECTION 1.(d) Grant Program Application; Limitations. – A qualifying business
must apply to the Department for a grant during the time frame and on a form prescribed by the
Department and must include any supporting documentation required by the Department. The
Department may accept applications until the funds appropriated in this section have been fully
awarded. The grant amount to a qualifying business may not exceed the lesser of (i) two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or (ii) the amount of reduction in sales tax collections of the
*S900-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
qualifying business resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic for the 2020 tax year when
compared to collections for the 2019 tax year. The total of all grants awarded under this Program
may not exceed two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000). The Department shall verify
that the business is a qualifying business with the Department of Revenue. Notwithstanding
G.S. 105-259, the Department of Revenue may disclose tax information to the Department of
Commerce to verify eligibility for the Program. The Department's grant determinations based on
applications filed are final.
SECTION 1.(e) Clawback. – A grant under the Program authorized in this section
shall be conditioned on a recipient business maintaining operations for a minimum of six months
following receipt of the grant, and the Department shall clawback a proportionate amount of the
grant for any portion of the six months the recipient business does not maintain business
operations.
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-153.5(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(15a) The amount granted to a taxpayer during the taxable year under the Small
Business Recovery Program."
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025, and expires for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 900-First Edition